Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
PART 1
CONSUMER PROTECTION - GENERAL

Law reviews:

For article, "The Showpiece Homes Decision: From

C

aveat Emptor to Insurer Beware?", see 31

C

olo. Law. 73 (April 2002).

6-1-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Consumer Protection Act".

Source:

L. 69:

p. 376, § 13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 55-5-13.

6-1-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Advertisement" includes the attempt by publication, dissemination, solicitation, or circulation, visual, oral, or written, to induce directly or indirectly any person to enter into any obligation or to acquire any title or interest in any property.

"Article" means a product as distinguished from a trademark, label, or distinctive dress in packaging.

(2.5) "Business day" means any calendar day except Sunday, New Year's day, the third Monday in January observed as the birthday of Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., Washington-Lincoln day, Memorial day, Juneteenth, Independence day, Labor day, Frances Xavier Cabrini day, Veterans' day, Thanksgiving, and Christmas.

(2.7) "Buyers' club" means any person engaged in advertising or selling memberships that provide an exclusive right to members to purchase goods, food, services, or property at purported discount prices.

"Certification mark" means a mark used in connection with the goods or services of a person other than the certifier to indicate geographic origin, material, mode of manufacture, quality, accuracy, or other characteristics of the goods or services or to indicate that the work or labor on the goods or services was performed by members of a union or other organization.

"Collective mark" means a mark used by members of a cooperative, association, or other collective group or organization to identify goods or services and distinguish them from those of others, or to indicate membership in the collective group or organization.

(4.1) "Dance studio" means any person engaged in the advertisement or sale of dance studio services.

(4.2) "Dance studio services" means instruction, training, or assistance in dancing; the use of dance studio facilities; membership in any group, club, or association formed by a dance studio; and participation in dance competitions, dance showcases, trips, tours, parties, and other organized events and related travel arrangements.

(4.3) "Discount health plan" means a program evidenced by a membership agreement, contract, card, certificate, device, or mechanism, which offers health-care services, as defined in section 10-16-102 (33), C.R.S., or related products including, but not limited to, prescription drugs and medical equipment, at purported discounted rates from health-care providers advertised as participating in the program. A "discount health plan" does not include a program in which a participating provider has agreed, as a condition of his or her participation in the program, to negotiate the prices to be charged for his or her services directly with consumers in the program and the provider is not required to offer discounted prices for his or her services as part of the program.

(4.4) "Elderly person" means a person sixty years of age or older.

(4.5) "Food" means any raw, cooked, or processed edible substance, beverage, or ingredient used or intended for use or for sale in whole or part for human consumption.

(4.6) "Health club" means an establishment which provides health club services or facilities which purport to improve or maintain the user's physical condition or appearance through exercise. The term may include, but shall not be limited to, a spa, exercise club, exercise gym, health studio, or playing courts. The term shall not apply to any of the following:

Any establishment operated by a nonprofit organization or public or private school, college, or university;

Any establishment operated by the federal government, the state of Colorado, or any of the state's political subdivisions;

Any establishment which does not provide health club services or facilities as its primary purpose or business; or

Health-care facilities licensed or certified by the department of public health and environment pursuant to its authority under section 25-1.5-103, C.R.S.

(4.7) "Health club facilities" means equipment, physical structures, and other tangible property utilized by a health club to conduct its business. The term may include, but shall not be limited to, saunas, whirlpool baths, gymnasiums, running tracks, playing courts, swimming pools, shower areas, and exercise equipment.

(4.8) "Health club services" means services, privileges, or rights offered for sale or provided by a health club.

(4.9) "Manufactured home" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 42-1-102 (48.8).

"Mark" means a word, name, symbol, device, or any combination thereof in any form or arrangement.

(5.5) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as set forth in section 44-20-102.

"Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, unincorporated association, or two or more thereof having a joint or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity.

"Promoting a pyramid promotional scheme" means inducing one or more other persons to become participants, or attempting to so induce, or assisting another in promoting a pyramid promotional scheme by means of references or otherwise.

"Property" means any real or personal property, or both real and personal property, intangible property, or services.

"Pyramid promotional scheme" means any program utilizing a pyramid or chain process by which a participant in the program gives a valuable consideration in excess of fifty dollars for the opportunity or right to receive compensation or other things of value in return for inducing other persons to become participants for the purpose of gaining new participants in the program. Ordinary sales of goods or services to persons who are not purchasing in order to participate in such a scheme are not within this definition.

(9.5) "Resale time share" means a time share, including all or substantially all ownership, rights, or interests associated with the time share:

That has been acquired previously for personal, family, or household use; and

That is owned by a Colorado resident; or

The accommodations and other facilities of which are available for use through the time share and are primarily located in Colorado.

"Sale" means any sale, offer for sale, or attempt to sell any real or personal property for any consideration.

"Service mark" means a mark used by a person to identify services and to distinguish them from the services of others.

(11.2) Repealed.

(11.5) "Time share" means a time share estate, as defined in section 38-33-110 (5), a time share use, as defined in section 12-10-501 (4), or any campground or recreational membership that does not constitute the transfer of an interest in real property.

(11.7) (a) "Time share resale entity" means any person who, either directly or indirectly, engages in a time share resale service.

"Time share resale entity" does not include:

The developer, association of time share owners, or other person responsible for managing or operating the plan or arrangement by which the rights or interests associated with a resale time share are utilized, but only to the extent the resale time share is part of an existing plan or arrangement managed by that developer, association, or person;

Attorneys, title agents, title companies, or escrow companies providing closing, settlement, or other transaction services as long as the services are provided in the normal course of business in supporting a conveyance of title or in issuing title insurance products in a time share resale transaction. To the extent the attorney, title agent, title company, or escrow company is engaged in providing services or products that are outside the normal course of business in supporting a conveyance of title or in issuing title insurance products or has an affiliated business arrangement with a party to a time share resale transaction, this exemption does not apply; or

Real estate brokers operating within the scope of activities specified in section 12-10-201 (6) with respect to a time share resale transaction as long as the real estate broker does not collect a fee in advance. To the extent a real estate broker is engaged in activities outside the scope of activities specified in section 12-10-201 (6), collects an advance fee, or has an affiliated business arrangement with a party to a time share resale transaction, this exemption does not apply.

(11.8) "Time share resale service" means any of the following activities, engaged in directly or indirectly and for consideration, regardless of whether performed in person, by mail, by telephone, or by any other mode of internet or electronic communication, unless performed by a person or entity that, pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (11.7) of this section, is exempted:

The sale, rental, listing, or advertising of, or an offer to sell, rent, list, or advertise, any resale time share;

The purchase or offer to purchase any resale time share;

The transfer or offer to assist in the transfer of any resale time share; or

The invalidation or an offer to invalidate the purchase or ownership of any resale time share or the purchase of any time share resale service.

(11.9) (a) "Time share resale transfer agreement" means a contract between a time share resale entity and the owner of a resale time share in which the time share resale entity agrees to transfer, or offers to assist in the transfer, of all or substantially all of the rights or interests in a resale time share on behalf of the owner of the resale time share.

"Time share resale transfer agreement" does not include a contract to sell, rent, list, advertise, purchase, or transfer a resale time share if the owner of the resale time share:

Upon entering the contract, reasonably expects to receive consideration in exchange for the resale time share; and

Upon the actual sale, rental, or transfer of the time share, receives consideration.

For purposes of this subsection (11.9), a transfer of the resale time share does not, by itself, constitute consideration.

"Trademark" means a mark used by a person to identify goods and to distinguish them from the goods of others.

"Trade name" means a word, name, symbol, device, or any combination thereof in any form or arrangement used by a person to identify his business, vocation, or occupation, and to distinguish it from the business, vocation, or occupation of others.

(13.5) "Unavoidable delay" means inclement weather and other events outside the control of the buyer or seller.

"Used motor vehicle" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 42-6-201 (8), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 371, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 55-5-1.

L. 73:

p. 619, § 1.

L. 84:

(4.5) and (11.5) added, pp. 289, 290, §§ 1, 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(4.6) to (4.8) added, p. 306, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 87:

(2.5) added and (9), (10), and (11.5) amended, p. 356, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(4.2) and (4.3) added, p. 341, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(2.7) and (11.2) added, p. 380, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(5.5) and (14) added, p. 1835, § 1, effective April 29.

L. 93:

(11.2) repealed, p. 943, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(4.6)(d) amended, p. 2721, § 310, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(4.9) and (13.5) added, p. 746, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2000:

(2.7) amended, p. 244, § 1, effective March 30; (4.4) added, p. 1107, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2003:

(4.6)(d) amended, p. 699, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(4.1) added and (4.2) and (4.3) amended, p. 967, § 7, effective May 21.

L. 2013:

(4.3) amended (HB 13-1266), ch. 217, p. 984, § 37, effective May 13; (9.5), (11.7), (11.8), and (11.9) added, (SB 13-182), ch. 166, p. 539, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

IP and (5.5) amended, (SB 17-240), ch. 395, p. 2063, § 43, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(5.5) amended, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 138, § 5, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(11.5) and (11.7)(b)(III) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1643, § 7, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

(2.5) amended, (HB 20-1031), ch. 43, p. 144, § 4, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(2.5) amended, (SB 22-139), ch. 149, p. 958, § 3, effective May 2; (4.9) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2965, § 12, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 20-1031, see section 1 of chapter 43, Session Laws of Colorado 2020. For the legislative declaration in SB 22-139, see section 1 of chapter 149, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

6-1-103. Attorney general and district attorneys concurrently responsible for enforcement.

The attorney general and the district attorneys of the several judicial districts of this state are concurrently responsible for the enforcement of this article 1. Until the Colorado supreme court adopts a venue provision relating to this article 1, actions instituted pursuant to this article 1 may be brought in the county where an alleged deceptive trade practice occurred or where any portion of a transaction involving an alleged deceptive trade practice occurred, or in the county where the principal place of business of any defendant is located, or in the county in which any defendant resides. An action under this article 1 brought by the attorney general or a district attorney does not require proof that a deceptive trade practice has a significant public impact.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 376, § 11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 55-5-11.

L. 73:

p. 620, § 4.

L. 77:

Entire section R&RE, p. 348, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 357, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1289), ch. 268, p. 2515, § 1, effective May 23.

6-1-104. Cooperative reporting.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective until July 1, 2023.

]

The district attorneys may cooperate in a statewide reporting system by receiving, on forms provided by the attorney general, complaints from persons concerning deceptive trade practices listed in section 6-1-105 and part 7 of this article and transmitting such complaints to the attorney general.

6-1-104. Cooperative reporting.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective July 1, 2023.

]

The district attorneys may cooperate in a statewide reporting system by receiving, on forms provided by the attorney general, complaints from persons concerning deceptive trade practices listed in section 6-1-105 or part 7 or 13 of this article 1 and transmitting the complaints to the attorney general.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 376, § 10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 55-5-10.

L. 73:

p. 619, § 3.

L. 77:

Entire section R&RE, p. 348, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 445, § 2, effective April 17.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 652, § 4, effective May 18.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-190), ch. 483, p. 3465, § 2, effective July 1, 2023.

Editor's note:

Section 7(2) of chapter 483 (SB 21-190), Session Laws of Colorado 2021, provides that the act changing this section applies to conduct occurring on or after July 1, 2023.

6-1-105. Unfair or deceptive trade practices.

A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the course of the person's business, vocation, or occupation, the person:

Either knowingly or recklessly passes off goods, services, or property as those of another;

Either knowingly or recklessly makes a false representation as to the source, sponsorship, approval, or certification of goods, services, or property;

Either knowingly or recklessly makes a false representation as to affiliation, connection, or association with or certification by another;

Uses deceptive representations or designations of geographic origin in connection with goods or services;

Either knowingly or recklessly makes a false representation as to the characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits, alterations, or quantities of goods, food, services, or property or a false representation as to the sponsorship, approval, status, affiliation, or connection of a person therewith;

Represents that goods are original or new if he knows or should know that they are deteriorated, altered, reconditioned, reclaimed, used, or secondhand;

Represents that goods, food, services, or property are of a particular standard, quality, or grade, or that goods are of a particular style or model, if he knows or should know that they are of another;

Disparages the goods, services, property, or business of another by false or misleading representation of fact;

Advertises goods, services, or property with intent not to sell them as advertised;

Advertises goods or services with intent not to supply reasonably expectable public demand, unless the advertisement discloses a limitation of quantity;

Advertises under the guise of obtaining sales personnel when in fact the purpose is to first sell a product or service to the sales personnel applicant;

Makes false or misleading statements of fact concerning the price of goods, services, or property or the reasons for, existence of, or amounts of price reductions;

Fails to deliver to the customer at the time of an installment sale of goods or services a written order, contract, or receipt setting forth the name and address of the seller, the name and address of the organization which he represents, and all of the terms and conditions of the sale, including a description of the goods or services, stated in readable, clear, and unambiguous language;

Employs "bait and switch" advertising, which is advertising accompanied by an effort to sell goods, services, or property other than those advertised or on terms other than those advertised and which is also accompanied by one or more of the following practices:

Refusal to show the goods or property advertised or to offer the services advertised;

Disparagement in any respect of the advertised goods, property, or services or the terms of sale;

Requiring tie-in sales or other undisclosed conditions to be met prior to selling the advertised goods, property, or services;

Refusal to take orders for the goods, property, or services advertised for delivery within a reasonable time;

Showing or demonstrating defective goods, property, or services which are unusable or impractical for the purposes set forth in the advertisement;

Accepting a deposit for the goods, property, or services and subsequently switching the purchase order to higher-priced goods, property, or services; or

Failure to make deliveries of the goods, property, or services within a reasonable time or to make a refund therefor;

Either knowingly or recklessly fails to identify flood-damaged or water-damaged goods as to such damages;

Solicits door-to-door as a seller, unless the seller, within thirty seconds after beginning the conversation, identifies himself or herself, whom he or she represents, and the purpose of the call;

to (p.7) Repealed.

Contrives, prepares, sets up, operates, publicizes by means of advertisements, or promotes any pyramid promotional scheme;

Advertises or otherwise represents that goods or services are guaranteed without clearly and conspicuously disclosing the nature and extent of the guarantee, any material conditions or limitations in the guarantee which are imposed by the guarantor, the manner in which the guarantor will perform, and the identity of such guarantor. Any representation that goods or services are "guaranteed for life" or have a "lifetime guarantee" shall contain, in addition to the other requirements of this paragraph (r), a conspicuous disclosure of the meaning of "life" or "lifetime" as used in such representation (whether that of the purchaser, the goods or services, or otherwise). Guarantees shall not be used which under normal conditions could not be practically fulfilled or which are for such a period of time or are otherwise of such a nature as to have the capacity and tendency of misleading purchasers or prospective purchasers into believing that the goods or services so guaranteed have a greater degree of serviceability, durability, or performance capability in actual use than is true in fact. The provisions of this paragraph (r) apply not only to guarantees but also to warranties, to disclaimer of warranties, to purported guarantees and warranties, and to any promise or representation in the nature of a guarantee or warranty; however, such provisions do not apply to any reference to a guarantee in a slogan or advertisement so long as there is no guarantee or warranty of specific merchandise or other property.

Repealed.

Fails to disclose material information concerning goods, services, or property which information was known at the time of an advertisement or sale if such failure to disclose such information was intended to induce the consumer to enter into a transaction;

Disburses funds in connection with a real estate transaction in violation of section 38-35-125 (2), C.R.S.;

Repealed.

Violates sections 6-1-203 to 6-1-206 or part 7 of this article 1;

Fails, in connection with any solicitation, oral or written, to clearly and prominently disclose immediately adjacent to or after the description of any item or prize to be received by any person the actual retail value of each item or prize to be awarded. For the purposes of this paragraph (y), the actual retail value is the price at which substantial sales of the item were made in the person's trade area or in the trade area in which the item or prize is to be received within the last ninety days or, if no substantial sales were made, the actual cost of the item or prize to the person on whose behalf any contest or promotion is conducted; except that, whenever the actual cost of the item to the provider is less than fifteen dollars per item, a disclosure that "actual cost to the provider is less than fifteen dollars" may be made in lieu of disclosure of actual cost. The provisions of this paragraph (y) shall not apply to a promotion which is soliciting the sale of a newspaper, magazine, or periodical of general circulation, or to a promotion soliciting the sale of books, records, audio tapes, compact discs, or videos when the promoter allows the purchaser to review the merchandise without obligation for at least seven days and provides a full refund within thirty days after the receipt of the returned merchandise or when a membership club operation is in conformity with rules and regulations of the federal trade commission contained in 16 CFR 425.

Refuses or fails to obtain all governmental licenses or permits required to perform the services or to sell the goods, food, services, or property as agreed to or contracted for with a consumer;

Fails, in connection with the issuing, making, providing, selling, or offering to sell of a motor vehicle service contract, to comply with the provisions of article 11 of title 42, C.R.S.;

Repealed.

Engages in any commercial telephone solicitation which constitutes an unlawful telemarketing practice as defined in section 6-1-304;

Repealed.

Intentionally violates any provision of article 10 of title 5, C.R.S.;

(ee.5) to (ff) Repealed.

Fails to disclose or misrepresents to another person, a secured creditor, or an assignee by whom such person is retained to repossess personal property whether such person is bonded in accordance with section 4-9-629, C.R.S., or fails to file such bond with the attorney general;

Violates any provision of article 16 of this title;

Repealed.

Represents to any person that such person has won or is eligible to win any award, prize, or thing of value as the result of a contest, promotion, sweepstakes, or drawing, or that such person will receive or is eligible to receive free goods, services, or property, unless, at the time of the representation, the person has the present ability to supply such award, prize, or thing of value;

Violates any provision of article 6 of this title;

Either knowingly or recklessly makes a false representation as to the results of a radon test or the need for radon mitigation;

Violates section 35-27-113 (3)(e), (3)(f), or (3)(i), C.R.S.;

Repealed.

Fails to comply with the provisions of section 35-80-108 (1)(a), (1)(b), or (2)(f), C.R.S.;

Violates article 9 of title 42, C.R.S.;

Repealed.

Violates the provisions of part 8 of this article;

Violates any provision of part 33 of article 32 of title 24 that applies to the installation of manufactured homes or tiny homes;

Violates any provision of part 9 of this article;

Violates section 38-40-105, C.R.S.;

Violates section 24-21-523 (1)(f) or (1)(i) or 24-21-525 (3), (4), or (5);

Violates any provision of section 6-1-702;

Violates any provision of part 11 of this article;

Repealed.

Violates any provision of section 6-1-717;

Violates any provision of section 12-10-710;

Violates any provision of section 12-10-713;

Violates the provisions of section 6-1-722;

Violates section 6-1-724;

Violates section 6-1-701;

Violates section 6-1-723;

Violates section 6-1-725;

Either knowingly or recklessly represents that hemp, hemp oil, or any derivative of a hemp plant constitutes retail marijuana or medical marijuana unless it fully satisfies the definition of such products pursuant to section 44-10-103 (34) or (57);

Either knowingly or recklessly enters into, or attempts to enforce, an agreement regarding the recovery of an overbid on foreclosed property if the agreement concerns the recovery of funds in the possession of:

A public trustee prior to transfer of the funds to the state treasurer under section 38-38-111; or

The state treasurer and does not meet the requirements for such an agreement as specified in section 38-13-1304;

Violates section 6-1-726;

Repealed.

Violates article 20 of title 5;

Violates section 12-30-112;

[Editor's note: This subsection (1)(nnn) is effective July 1, 2023.] Violates any provision of part 13 of this article 1 as specified in section 6-1-1311 (1)(c).

[Editor's note: This subsection (1)(ooo) is effective January 1, 2023.] Violates part 14 of this article 1;

[Editor's note: This subsection (1)(ppp) is effective February 1, 2023.] Violates section 7-90-314 (1);

[Editor's note: This subsection (1)(qqq) is effective January 1, 2023.] Violates part 15 of this article 1;

Either knowingly or recklessly engages in any unfair, unconscionable, deceptive, deliberately misleading, false, or fraudulent act or practice.

Violates this section as it applies to hemp, industrial hemp, industrial hemp products, intoxicating hemp, adult use cannabis products, the plant cannabis sp., or anything derived from or produced from the plant cannabis sp.

Violates part 4 of article 10.1 of title 40.

Evidence that a person has engaged in a deceptive trade practice shall be prima facie evidence of intent to injure competitors and to destroy or substantially lessen competition.

The deceptive trade practices listed in this section are in addition to and do not limit the types of unfair trade practices actionable at common law or under other statutes of this state.

For purposes of this section, "recklessly" means a reckless disregard for the truth or falsity of a statement or advertisement.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 372, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 55-5-2.

L. 71:

p. 580, § 1.

L. 73:

p. 619, § 2.

L. 75:

(1)(r) added, p. 259, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1)(e) and (1)(g) amended and (1)(s) added, pp. 289, 290, §§ 2, 2, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1)(t) added, p. 307, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 87:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(e), (1)(g) to (1)(i), and (1)(l) amended and (1)(s)(V) and (1)(u) added, p. 357, §§ 3, 4, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(1)(n) amended and (1)(v) and (1)(w) added, pp. 341, 1260, §§ 2, 2, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1)(s)(V) repealed and (1)(y), (1)(z), and (1)(aa) added, pp. 360, 357, §§ 4, 1, effective July 7; (1)(x) added, p. 363, § 2, effective January 1, 1990.

L. 90:

(1)(ee) added, p. 378, § 2, effective April 20; (1)(t)(VI) amended and (1)(bb) to (1)(dd) added, p. 380, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1)(t)(VI) amended and (1)(t)(VII) added, p. 329, § 1, effective May 16; (1)(dd)(I) amended and (1)(dd)(I.5) added, p. 331, § 1, effective June 8.

L. 92:

IP(1) amended and (1)(ff) added, p. 1835, § 2, effective April 29; IP(1) amended and (1)(gg) added, p. 247, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 93:

(1)(t)(VI) and (1)(y) amended and (1)(hh) to (1)(ll) added, p. 1571, § 1, effective July 1; (1)(cc) amended, p. 943, § 2, effective July 1; (1)(mm) added, p. 1022, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1)(nn) added, p. 759, § 1, effective April 20; (1)(ee.5) added, p. 94, § 1, effective July 1; (1)(oo) added, p. 1311, § 10, effective July 1; (1)(aa) and (1)(ii) amended, p. 2544, § 14, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(1)(p) amended and (1)(p.3) and (1)(ee.7) added, pp. 787, 1787, §§ 1, 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1)(pp) added, p. 865, § 13, effective May 21; (1)(p.5) and (1)(p.7) added, p. 500, § 1, effective July 1; (1)(ee.8) added, p. 406, § 1, July 1.

L. 98:

(1)(qq) added, p. 746, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 99:

(1)(p.3), (1)(p.5), (1)(p.7), (1)(s), (1)(t), (1)(w), (1)(bb), (1)(dd), (1)(ee.5), (1)(ee.7), (1)(ee.8), (1)(ff), (1)(ii), and (1)(qq) repealed and (1)(x) amended, pp. 655, 652, §§ 14, 3, effective May 18; (1)(qq) amended, p. 897, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(rr) added, p. 867, § 2, effective August 2; (1)(nn)(II) added by revision, pp. 2, 3, §§ 1, 6; (1)(ss) added, p. 1162, § 3, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2001:

(1)(gg) amended, p. 1445, § 37, effective July 1; (1)(tt) added, p. 1461, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2002:

(1)(uu) added, p. 1602, § 3, effective June 7.

L. 2003:

(1)(ss) amended, p. 550, § 3, effective March 5.

L. 2004:

(1)(vv) added, p. 181, § 2, effective July 1; (1)(ww) added, p. 407, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2006:

(1)(xx) added, p. 1344, § 2, effective May 30.

L. 2007:

(1)(zz) added, p. 1728, § 5, effective June 1; (1)(aaa) and (1)(bbb) added, p. 1723, § 10, effective June 1; (1)(yy) added, p. 809, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(ccc) added, (SB 10-155), ch. 180, p. 648, § 2, effective August 11.

L. 2013:

(1)(eee) added, (SB 13-228), ch. 271, p. 1425, § 2, effective May 24; (IP)(1) amended and (1)(ddd) added, (SB 13-215), ch. 399, p. 2335, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2014:

(1)(fff) and (1)(ggg) added, (HB 14-1037), ch. 358, p. 1681, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2015:

(1)(hhh) added, (SB 15-014), ch. 199, p. 688, § 7, effective May 18; (1)(yy) repealed, (SB 15-264), ch. 259, p. 941, § 7, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(1)(jjj) added, (HB 16-1335), ch. 246, p. 1015, § 2, effective July 1; (1)(bbb) amended, (HB 16-1306), ch. 117, p. 331, § 1, effective August 10; (1)(iii) added, (HB 16-1090), ch. 97, p. 276, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(1)(vv) amended, (SB 17-132), ch. 207, p. 808, § 4, effective July 1, 2018.

L. 2018:

(1)(x) amended, (SB 18-100), ch. 36, p. 392, § 1, effective August 8; (1)(hhh) amended, (HB 18-1023), ch. 55, p. 584, § 4, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(e), (1)(o), (1)(ll), (1)(hhh), and (1)(iii) amended and (1)(kkk) and (4) added, (HB 19-1289), ch. 268, p. 2515, § 2, effective May 23; (1)(lll) added, (SB 19-002), ch. 157, p. 1872, § 3, effective August 2; (1)(aaa) and (1)(bbb) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1643, § 8, effective October 1; (1)(hhh) amended, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2935, § 8, effective January 1, 2020; (1)(mmm) added, (HB 19-1174), ch. 171, p. 1982, § 1, effective January 1, 2020; (1)(iii)(II) amended, (SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 462, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2021:

(1)(nnn) added, (SB 21-190), ch. 483, p. 3465, § 3, effective July 1, 2023.

L. 2022:

(1)(sss) added, (SB 22-205), ch. 278, p. 2002, § 3, effective May 31; (1)(ss) amended, (HB 22-1242), ch. 172, p. 1135, § 25, effective August 10; (1)(mmm) amended, (HB 22-1284), ch. 446, p. 3151, § 6, effective August 10; (1)(ttt) added, (HB 22-1314), ch. 416, p. 2948, § 12, effective August 10; (1)(kkk) repealed and (1)(rrr) added, (HB 22-1287), ch. 255, p. 1885, § 27, effective October 1; (1)(ooo) added, (HB 22-1099), ch. 21, p. 143, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; (1)(qqq) added, (HB 22-1031), ch. 327, p. 2307, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; (1)(ppp) added, (SB 22-034), ch. 326, p. 2306, § 2, effective February 1, 2023.

6-1-105.5. Hearing aid dealers - deceptive trade practices. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 86:

Entire section added, p. 443, § 1, effective April 17.

L. 87:

(2)(e)(III) amended, p. 358, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(2)(e)(II) amended, p. 343, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (2)(a), (2)(b), (2)(c), IP(2)(d), (2)(e), and (2)(f) amended and (1)(a.5), (1)(e), (2)(i), and (2)(j) added, pp. 228, 231, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1.

L. 93:

IP(2), (2)(e)(I), and (2)(i), amended, p. 1573, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 95.

IP(2) and (2)(e) amended and (3) added, p. 1331, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section repealed, p. 655, § 14, effective May 18.

6-1-106. Exclusions.

This article does not apply to:

Conduct in compliance with the orders or rules of, or a statute administered by, a federal, state, or local governmental agency;

Publishers, including outdoor advertising media, advertising agencies, broadcasters, or printers engaged in the dissemination of information or reproduction of printed or pictorial matter who publish, broadcast, or reproduce material without knowledge of its deceptive character; or

Actions or appeals pending on or before July 1, 1969.

This article shall not be interpreted to apply to the use by a person of any service mark, trademark, certification mark, collective mark, trade name, or other trade identification which was used and not abandoned prior to July 1, 1969, if the use was in good faith and is otherwise lawful except for the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 373, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 55-5-3.

6-1-107. Powers of attorney general and district attorneys.

[Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (1) is effective until July 1, 2023.] When the attorney general or a district attorney has reasonable cause to believe that any person, whether in this state or elsewhere, has engaged in or is engaging in any deceptive trade practice listed in section 6-1-105 or part 7 of this article, the attorney general or district attorney may:

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (1) is effective July 1, 2023.

]

When the attorney general or a district attorney has reasonable cause to believe that any person, whether in this state or elsewhere, has engaged in or is engaging in any deceptive trade practice listed in section 6-1-105 or part 7 or 13 of this article 1, the attorney general or district attorney may:

Request such person to file a statement or report in writing under oath or otherwise, on forms prescribed by him, as to all facts and circumstances concerning the sale or advertisement of property by such person and any other data and information he deems necessary;

Examine under oath any person in connection with the sale or advertisement of any property;

Examine any property or sample thereof, record, book, document, account, or paper he deems necessary;

Make true copies, at the expense of the attorney general or district attorney, of any record, book, document, account, or paper examined pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (1), which copies may be offered into evidence in lieu of the originals thereof in actions brought pursuant to sections 6-1-109 and 6-1-110; and

Pursuant to any order of any district court, impound any sample of property which is material to such deceptive trade practice and retain the same in his possession until completion of all proceedings undertaken under this article. An order shall not be issued pursuant to this paragraph (e) without full opportunity given to the accused to be heard and unless the attorney general or district attorney has proven by clear and convincing evidence that the business activities of the person to whom an order is directed will not be impaired thereby.

Nothing in subsection (1) of this section shall be construed to allow a district attorney to enforce the provisions of this article beyond the territorial limits of his judicial district, unless the alleged deceptive trade practice or any portion of a transaction involving an alleged deceptive trade practice occurred in said district attorney's judicial district, or unless the principal place of business of any defendant is located in said district attorney's district, or unless any defendant resides in said district attorney's judicial district.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 373, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 55-5-4.

L. 77:

IP(1), (1)(d), and (1)(e) amended and (2) added, p. 348, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 86:

IP(1) amended, p. 445, § 3, effective April 17.

L. 87:

(2) amended, p. 358, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 99:

IP(1) amended, p. 653, § 5, effective May 18.

L. 2013:

IP(1) amended, (SB 13-248), ch. 270, p. 1417, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

IP(1) amended, (HB 17-1023), ch. 64, p. 204, § 2, effective March 20.

L. 2021:

IP(1) amended, (SB 21-190), ch. 483, p. 3465, § 4, effective July 1, 2023.

Editor's note:

Section 7(2) of chapter 483 (SB 21-190), Session Laws of Colorado 2021, provides that the act changing this section applies to conduct occurring on or after July 1, 2023.